Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.982

Fish enhancement projects—County's liability.

A county is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW 77.55.181 and has been permitted by the department of fish and wildlife.

[ 2014 c 120 s 13; 2003 c 39 s 19; 1998 c 249 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Report—Effective date—1998 c 249: See notes following RCW 77.55.181.